Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-1,110
Consumer credit default procedures; not applicable to certain licensees.

Sections 45-1,105 to 45-1,110 shall not apply to any licensee operating under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.

Laws 1983, LB 111, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 555, § 26;

Laws 2001, LB 53, § 100;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 54.

Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, see section 45-334.